New York, session 2025-2026, A4881.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Legislative findings. The Legislature finds that New York's 2 current system of filling federal and state elected office vacancies 3 places undue financial and operational burdens on local boards of 4 elections and exacerbates voter confusion and fatigue by asking voters 5 to frequently participate in elections throughout the year, thus result- 6 ing in lower voter turnout and decreased participation in the electoral 7 process. 8 Local boards must comply with state requirements and federal require- 9 ments under the Help America Vote Act (HAVA), which include training 10 poll workers to ensure elections remain inclusive and accessible to 11 voters. The unpredictability of holding multiple elections throughout 12 the year may leave local boards unable to fiscally plan for such unex- 13 pected expenses. County boards generally have months of preparation 14 ahead of elections given the complexities associated with executing an 15 election - including setting up poll sites, processing voter registra- 16 tions, and gathering the necessary staff to help run the election. It is 17 therefore an inefficient use of funds to schedule a special election so 18 close to a general election date, causing county boards to reduplicate 19 the significant effort and funding in a short period of time. 20 Further, voter fatigue occurs when voters are asked to participate in 21 frequent elections throughout the year. In addition, multiple elections 22 can create a process which is confusing or challenging for voters, 23 resulting in lower voter turnout and subsequently a less representative 24 electorate for the people. This is particularly true in congressional 25 elections, which may encompass multiple counties and involve several 26 boards of elections. Ensuring that congressional elections are set to 27 maximize voter turnout is of fundamental importance to the Legislature 28 and a well-functioning elections system. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09222-01-5 A. 4881 2 1 While vacancies in elected offices can occur at any time, occasionally 2 necessitating additional special elections in unusual times of the year, 3 the Legislature finds it is crucial to ensure efficiencies in elections 4 where possible and maximize voter turnout. For these reasons, the 5 Legislature seeks to create such efficiencies and increase voter turnout 6 by allowing for the combination of special elections with general 7 election dates in state elections when the special election would occur 8 close in time with a general election date already determined by the 9 State Board of Elections. For congressional elections, the Legislature 10 seeks to create such efficiencies and increase voter turnout by allowing 11 for special elections to be combined with a general election. This will 12 prevent the doubling of efforts and the excess expenditure of taxpayer 13 funds as well as ensure that county boards, voters, and candidates are 14 prepared and informed. 15 § 2. Subdivision 3 of section 42 of the public officers law, as 16 amended by chapter 164 of the laws of 2022, is amended to read as 17 follows: 18 3. Upon the failure to elect to any office, except that of governor or 19 lieutenant-governor, at a general or special election, at which such 20 office is authorized to be filled, or upon the death or disqualification 21 of a person elected to office before the commencement of [his or her] 22 their official term, or upon the occurrence of a vacancy in any elective 23 office which cannot be filled by appointment for a period extending to 24 or beyond the next general election at which a person may be elected 25 thereto, the governor shall, unless otherwise provided for by authorized 26 local law, resolution or ordinance, make proclamation of a special 27 election to fill such office within [ten] fifteen days of the occurrence 28 of a vacancy, specifying the district or county in which the election is 29 to be held, and the day thereof, which shall be: 30 a. not less than seventy nor more than eighty days from the date of 31 the proclamation to fill a vacancy in the office of a representative in 32 congress or for a vacancy in any other office that is not in the state 33 senate or assembly, provided, however, that if there is a vacancy occur- 34 ring in the same calendar year as a general election date set pursuant 35 to section 8-100 of the election law, a proclamation may be issued so 36 that the special election may be scheduled on the general election date; 37 and 38 b. not less than forty days nor more than fifty days from the date of 39 the proclamation to fill a vacancy in the state senate or assembly, 40 provided, however, that [the] if there is a general election date set 41 pursuant to section 8-100 of the election law which is not less than 42 forty nor more than one hundred days from the date the proclamation to 43 fill such vacancy must be issued, a proclamation may be issued so that 44 the special election may be scheduled on the general election date. The 45 governor may issue a proclamation to fill any subsequent vacancy in the 46 state senate or assembly for the same date as any previously scheduled 47 special election as long as the proclamation is issued at least thirty 48 days before the occurrence of the special election. 49 c. Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to require a special 50 election to be consolidated with any already scheduled general election 51 date. 52 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. Notwithstanding any other 53 provision of law, this act shall apply to any vacancy for which a proc- 54 lamation may be issued under section 42 of the public officers law but 55 has not yet been issued as of the effective date of this act.